Hawaii statutes.
§11-336 Time for noncandidate
committee to file preliminary, final, and supplemental reports. (a) The
filing dates for preliminary reports are:

(1) Ten calendar days prior to a primary, special, or
nonpartisan election;

(2) Ten calendar days prior to a general election;
and

(3) October 1 of the year of a general election.

Each preliminary report shall be current through the
fifth calendar day prior to the filing of the report.

(b) The filing date for the final primary
report is twenty calendar days after the primary, initial special, or initial nonpartisan
election. The report shall be current through the day of the applicable
election.

(c) The filing date for the final election
period report is thirty calendar days after a general, subsequent special, or subsequent
nonpartisan election. The report shall be current through the day of the
applicable election.

(d) The filing dates for supplemental reports
are:

(1) January 31; and

(2) July 31 after an election year.

The report shall be current through December 31 for
the report filed on January 31 and current through June 30 for the report filed
on July 31.

(e) The authorized person in the case of a
party, or treasurer in the case of any other noncandidate committee, shall
continue to file all reports until the committee's registration is terminated
as provided in section 11-326. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 111, §2;
am L 2015, c 79, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next